California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 responsible relative, within 12 hours from the time of actual receipt of the notice, or within 48 hours from the time of actual receipt of the notice in any case where a petition to declare the minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 was dismissed at or before the jurisdictional hearing.

(b) The liability established by this section, when combined with any liability arising under Section 903, shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each 24-hour period, beginning when notice of release was actually received, or beginning 48 hours after notice of release was actually received in any case where a petition to declare the minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 was dismissed at or before the jurisdictional hearing, in which a notified parent or guardian has failed to make a reasonable effort to take
 delivery of the minor, in person or through a responsible relative, in accordance with the request and instructions of the probation officer.

(c) The liability established by this section shall be limited by the financial ability of the parents, guardians, or other persons to pay. Any parent, guardian, or other person who is assessed under this section shall, upon request, be entitled to an evaluation and determination of ability to pay under the provisions of Section 903.45. Any parent, guardian, or other person who is assessed under this section shall also be entitled, upon petition, to a hearing and determination by the juvenile court on the issues of liability and ability to pay.

(d) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of
 the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 23.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.4.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds that even though Section 903 establishes parental liability for the cost of the care, support, and maintenance of a child in a county institution or other place in which the child is placed, detained, or committed pursuant to an order of the juvenile court, the collection of child support for juveniles who have been placed in out-of-home care as dependents of the juvenile court under Section 300 has not been pursued routinely and effectively.

(2) It is the purpose of this section to substantially increase income to the state and to counties through court-ordered parental reimbursement for the support of juveniles who are in out-of-home placement.
 In this regard, the Legislature finds that the costs of collection will be offset by the additional income derived from the increased effectiveness of the parental support program.

(b) In any case in which a child is or has been declared a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300, the juvenile court shall order any agency that has expended moneys or incurred costs on behalf of the child pursuant to a detention or placement order of the juvenile court, to submit to the local child support agency, within 30 days, in the form of a declaration, a statement of its costs and expenses for the benefit, support, and maintenance of the child.

(c) (1) (A) The local child support agency may petition the superior court to issue an order to show
 cause why an order should not be entered for continuing support and reimbursement of the
 costs of the support of any minor described in Section 903.

(B) Any order entered as a result of the order to show cause shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other support order entered by the courts of this state at the time it becomes due and payable.

(C) In any case in which the local child support agency has received a declaration of costs or expenses from any agency, the declaration shall be deemed an application for assistance pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code.

(2) The order to show cause shall inform the parent of all of the following facts:

(A) He or she has been sued.

(B) If he or she wishes to seek the advice of an attorney in this matter, it should be done promptly so that his or her financial declaration and written response, if any, will be filed on time.

(C) He or she has a right to appear personally and present evidence in his or her behalf.

(D) His or her failure to appear at the order to show cause hearing, personally or through his or her attorney, may result in an order being entered against him or her for the relief requested in the petition.

(E) Any order entered could result in the garnishment of wages, taking of money or property to enforce the order, or being held in contempt of court.

(F) Any party
 has a right to request a modification of any order issued by the superior court in the event of a change in circumstances.

(3) Any existing support order shall remain in full force and effect unless the superior court modifies that order pursuant to subdivision (f).

(4) The local child support agency shall not be required to petition the court for an order for continuing support and reimbursement if, in the opinion of the local child support agency, it would not be appropriate to secure that order. The local child support agency shall not be required to continue collection efforts for any order if, in the opinion of the local child support agency, it would not be appropriate or cost effective to enforce the order pursuant to Section 17552 of the Family Code.

(d) (1) In any case in which an order to show cause has been issued and served upon a parent for continuing support and reimbursement of costs, a completed income and expense declaration shall be filed with the court by the parent; a copy of it shall be delivered to the local child support agency at least five days prior to the hearing on the order to show cause.

(2) Any person authorized by law to receive a parent’s financial declaration or information obtained therefrom, who knowingly furnishes the declaration or information to a person not authorized by law to receive it, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) (1) If a parent has been personally served with the order to show cause and
 no appearance is made by the parent, or an attorney in his or her behalf, at the hearing on the order to show cause, the court may enter an order for the principal amount and continuing support in the amount demanded in the petition.

(2) If the parent appears at the hearing on the order to show cause, the court may enter an order for the amount the court determines the parent is financially able to pay.

(f) The court shall have continuing jurisdiction to modify any order for continuing support entered pursuant to this section.

(g) As used in this section, “parent” includes any person specified in Section 903, the estate of that person, and the estate of the minor person. “Parent” does not include a minor or nonminor
 dependent whose minor child receives aid under Section 11401.4.

(h) The local child support agency may contract with another county agency for the performance of any of the duties required by this section.

(i) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of
 the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 24.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.41.

(a) It is the intention of the Legislature that the family law departments and juvenile departments of each superior court coordinate determinations of parentage and the setting of support to ensure that the State of California remains in compliance with federal regulations for child support guidelines. The Legislature therefore enacts this section for the purpose of ensuring a document exchange between the family law departments and juvenile departments of each superior court as necessary to administer the public social services administered or supervised by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) If the issue of paternity is raised during any hearings pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602, the court clerk shall notify the local child support agency for an inquiry concerning any superior court order or judgment which addresses the issue.

(1) If the local child support agency determines that a judgment for parentage already exists, the local child support agency shall obtain and forward certified copies of the judgment to the juvenile court and the court shall take judicial notice thereof.

(2) If the local child support agency determines that the issue of parentage has not been determined, the juvenile court may determine the issue of parentage and, if it does so, shall give notice to the local child support agency.

(c) If the court establishes paternity of a minor child, the court clerk shall forward the order on a form to be adopted by the Judicial Council to the local child support agency.

(d) If a child is receiving public assistance under the CalWORKs program, or if it appears to the court that the child may receive assistance under CalWORKs, the court shall direct the clerk of the court to advise the local child support agency.

(e) The court shall advise the parent of the minor of the possibility that the local child support agency may file an action for support if the child receives CalWORKs, pursuant to Section 17402 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 119.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

903.45.

(a) The board of supervisors may designate a county financial evaluation officer pursuant to Section 27750 of the Government Code to make financial evaluations of liability for reimbursement pursuant to Sections 903, 903.1, 903.2, 903.25, 903.3, and 903.5, and other reimbursable costs allowed by law, as set forth in this section.

(b) (1) (A) In a county where a board of supervisors has designated a county financial
 evaluation officer, the juvenile court shall, at the close of the disposition hearing, order any person liable for the cost of support, pursuant to Section 903, the cost of legal services as provided for in Section 903.1, supervision costs as provided for in Section 903.2, or any other reimbursable costs allowed under this code, to appear before the county financial evaluation officer for a financial evaluation of his or her ability to pay those costs. If the responsible person is not present at the disposition hearing, the court shall cite him or her to appear for a financial evaluation. In the case of a parent, guardian, or other person assessed for the costs of transport, food, shelter, or care of a minor under Section
 903.25, the juvenile court shall, upon request of the county probation department, order the appearance of the parent, guardian, or other person before the county financial evaluation officer for a financial evaluation of his or her ability to pay the costs assessed.

(B) (i) This paragraph does not apply to costs described in this paragraph for purposes of a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), this paragraph applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child
 pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(2) If the county financial evaluation officer determines that a person so responsible has the ability to pay all or part of the costs, the county financial evaluation officer shall petition the court for an order requiring the person to pay that sum to the county or court, depending on which entity incurred the expense. If the parent or guardian is liable for costs for legal services pursuant to Section 903.1, the parent or guardian has been reunified with the child pursuant to a court order, and
 the county financial evaluation officer determines that repayment of the costs would harm the ability of the parent or guardian to support the child, then the county financial evaluation officer shall not petition the court for an order of repayment, and the court shall not make that order. In addition, if the parent or guardian is currently receiving reunification services, and the court finds, or the county financial officer determines, that repayment by the parent or guardian will pose a barrier to reunification with the child because it will limit the ability of the parent or guardian to comply with the requirements of the reunification plan or compromise the parent’s or guardian’s current or future ability to meet the financial needs of the child, or in any case in which the court finds that the repayment would be unjust under the circumstances of the case, then the county financial evaluation officer shall not petition the court for an order of repayment, and the court shall not order repayment by the
 parent or guardian. In evaluating a person’s ability to pay under this section, the county financial evaluation officer and the court shall take into consideration the family’s income, the necessary obligations of the family, and the number of persons dependent upon this income. A person appearing for a financial evaluation has the right to dispute the county financial evaluation officer’s determination, in which case he or she is entitled to a hearing before the juvenile court. The county financial evaluation officer, at the time of the financial evaluation, shall advise the person of his or her right to a hearing and of his or her rights pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) At
 the hearing, a person responsible for costs is entitled to have, but shall not be limited to, the opportunity to be heard in person, to present witnesses and other documentary evidence, to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, to disclosure of the evidence against him or her, and to receive a written statement of the findings of the court. The person has the right to be represented by counsel, and, if the person is unable to afford counsel, the right to appointed counsel. If the court determines that the person has the ability to pay all or part of the costs, including the costs of any counsel appointed to represent the person at the hearing, the court shall set the amount to be reimbursed and order him or her to pay that sum to the county or court, depending on which entity incurred the expense, in a manner in which the court believes reasonable and compatible with the person’s financial ability.

(4) If the person, after having been ordered to appear before the county financial evaluation officer, has been given proper notice and fails to appear as ordered, the county financial evaluation officer shall recommend to the court that the person be ordered to pay the full amount of the costs. Proper notice to the person shall contain all of the following:

(A) That the person has a right to a statement of the costs as soon as it is available.

(B) The person’s procedural rights under Section 27755 of the Government Code.

(C) The time limit within which the person’s appearance is required.

(D) A warning
 that if the person fails to appear before the county financial evaluation officer, the officer will recommend that the court order the person to pay the costs in full.

(5) If the county financial evaluation officer determines that the person has the ability to pay all or a portion of these costs, with or without terms, and the person concurs in this determination and agrees to the terms of payment, the county financial evaluation officer, upon his or her written evaluation and the person’s written agreement, shall petition the court for an order requiring the person to pay that sum to the county or the court in a manner that is reasonable and
 compatible with the person’s financial ability. This order may be granted without further notice to the person, provided that a copy of the order is served on the person by mail or by electronic means pursuant to Section 212.5.

(6) However, if the county financial evaluation officer cannot reach an agreement with the person with respect to
 either the liability for the costs, the amount of the costs, the person’s ability to pay the costs, or the terms of payment, the matter shall be deemed in dispute and referred by the county financial evaluation officer back to the court for a hearing.

(c) At any time prior to the satisfaction of a judgment entered pursuant to this section, a person against whom the judgment was entered may petition the rendering court to modify or vacate the judgment on the basis of a change in circumstances relating to his or her ability to pay the judgment.

(d) Execution may be issued on the order in the same manner as on a judgment in a civil action, including any balance remaining unpaid at the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 25.5.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.47.

(a) The Judicial Council shall establish a program to collect reimbursements from the person liable for the costs of counsel appointed to represent parents or minors pursuant to Section 903.1 in dependency proceedings.

(1) As part of the program, the Judicial Council shall:

(A) Adopt a statewide standard for determining the ability to pay reimbursements for counsel, which shall at a minimum include the family’s income, their necessary obligations, the number of individuals dependent on this income, and the cost-effectiveness of the program.

(B) Adopt policies and procedures allowing a court to
 recover from the money collected the costs associated with implementing the reimbursements program. The policies and procedures shall at a minimum limit the amount of money a court may recover to a reasonable proportion of the reimbursements collected and provide the terms and conditions under which a court may use a third party to collect reimbursements. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “costs associated with implementing the reimbursements program” means the court costs of assessing a parent’s ability to pay for court-appointed counsel and the costs to collect delinquent reimbursements.

(2) The money collected shall be deposited as required by Section 68085.1 of the Government Code. Except as otherwise authorized by law, the money collected under this program shall be utilized to reduce caseloads, for attorneys appointed by the court, to the caseload standard approved by the Judicial Council. Priority shall be given to those courts with
 the highest attorney caseloads that also demonstrate the ability to immediately improve outcomes for parents and children as a result of lower attorney caseloads.

(b) The court may do either of the following:

(1) Designate a court financial evaluation officer to make financial evaluations of liability for reimbursement pursuant to Section 903.1.

(2) With the consent of the county and pursuant to the terms and conditions agreed upon by the court and county, designate a county financial evaluation officer to make financial evaluations of liability for reimbursement pursuant to Section 903.1.

(c) In handling reimbursement of payments pursuant to Section 903.1, the court financial evaluation officer and the county financial evaluation officer shall follow
 the procedures set forth for county financial evaluation officers in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 903.45.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 308, Sec. 13.   (SB 647)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

903.5.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 903.4, and notwithstanding any other law, the parent or other person legally liable for the support of a minor, who voluntarily places the minor in 24-hour out-of-home care, shall be liable for the cost of the minor’s care, support, and maintenance when the minor receives Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC), Supplemental Security Income-State Supplementary Program (SSI-SSP), or county-only funds. As used in this section, “parent” includes any person specified in Section 903. As used in this section, “parent” does not include a minor or nonminor dependent whose minor child receives aid under Section 11401.4. Whenever the county welfare department or the placing agency
 determines that a court order would be advisable and effective, pursuant to Section 17552 of the Family Code, the department or the agency shall notify the local child support agency, or the financial evaluation officer designated pursuant to Section 903.45, who shall proceed pursuant to Section 903.4 or 903.45.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child
 pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 26.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.6.

Funds collected pursuant to Sections 903, 903.4, and 903.5 shall be distributed in the following manner:

(a) If the program through which the minor is placed is a county-funded program, the county shall retain 100 percent of the funds collected. For the purposes of this subdivision, programs funded in whole or part with county justices system subvention program funds shall be considered to be 100 percent county funded.

(b) If the program through which the minor is placed is funded partially with state or federal funds, the amounts collected shall be distributed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 11457 and incentives shall be paid pursuant to Sections 15200.1, 15200.2, and 15200.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1276, Sec. 7.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

903.7.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Foster Children and Parent Training Fund. The moneys contained in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) For each fiscal year beginning with the 1981-82 fiscal year, except as provided in Sections 15200.1, 15200.2, 15200.3, 15200.8, and 15200.81, and Section 17704 of the Family Code, the Department of Child Support Services shall determine the amount equivalent to the net state share of foster care collections attributable to the enforcement of parental fiscal liability pursuant to Sections 903, 903.4, and 903.5. On July 1, 1982, and every three months thereafter, the department shall notify the Chancellor of the Community Colleges, the Department of Finance, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction of the above-specified amount. The Department of Child Support Services shall authorize the quarterly transfer of any portion of this amount for any particular fiscal year exceeding three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) of the net state share of foster care collections to the Treasurer for deposit in the Foster Children and Parent Training Fund, except that, commencing with the 2002-03 fiscal year, a total of not more than three million dollars ($3,000,000) may be transferred to the fund in any fiscal year.

(c) (1) If sufficient moneys are available in the Foster Children and Parent Training Fund, up to three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be allocated for the support of foster parent training programs conducted in community colleges. The maximum amount authorized to be allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be adjusted annually by a cost-of-living increase each year based on the percentage given to discretionary education programs. Funds for the training program shall be provided in a separate budget item in that portion of the Budget Act pertaining to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, to be deposited in a separate bank account by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) The chancellor shall use these funds exclusively for foster parent training, as specified by the chancellor in consultation with the California State Foster Parents Association and the State Department of Social Services.

(3) The plans for each foster parent training program shall include the provision of training to facilitate the development of foster family homes and small family homes to care for no more than six children who have special mental, emotional, developmental, or physical needs.

(4) The State Department of Social Services shall facilitate the participation of county welfare departments in the foster parent training program. The California State Foster Parents Association, or the local chapters thereof, and the State Department of Social Services shall identify training participants and shall advise the chancellor on the form, content, and methodology of the training program. Funds shall be paid monthly to the foster parent training program until the maximum amount of funds authorized to be expended for that program is expended. No more than 10 percent or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) of these moneys, whichever is greater, shall be used for administrative purposes; of the 10 percent or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be expended to reimburse the State Department of Social Services for its services pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) Beginning with the 1983-84 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, after all allocations for foster parent training in community colleges have been made, any moneys remaining in the Foster Children and Parent Training Fund may be allocated for foster children services programs pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 42920) of Part 24 of the Education Code.

(e) (1) The Controller shall transfer moneys from the Foster Children and Parent Training Fund to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction as necessary to fulfill the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) After the maximum amount authorized in any fiscal year has been transferred to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Controller shall transfer any remaining funds to the General Fund for expenditure for any public purpose.

(f) This section shall be operative until June 30, 2005, and thereafter is operative only if specified in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 73, Sec. 26.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Section inoperative as of June 30, 2005, subject to resumed operation only as prescribed in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

903.8.

(a) Beginning January 1, 1994, the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement an enhanced statewide basic foster parent training program. It is the intent of the Legislature to fund this program by allocating unexpended child welfare services funds from the 1992–93 fiscal year to support a two and one-half year training curricula development.

(b) During this two and one-half year period, the State Department of Social Services shall do all of the following, in cooperation with foster parents and representatives from county placement agencies and other foster care providers:

(1) Complete a comprehensive survey of existing foster parent training curricula and resources, evaluate the existing foster parent training delivery system and explore alternative delivery models, complete a needs assessment of foster parents, and develop and implement a statewide core curriculum.

(2) Develop and implement curricula for, teenage pregnancy prevention and other special needs topics, as identified in the needs assessment, to supplement the core curriculum. The teenage pregnancy prevention topics shall be based upon public health fact-based materials and programs. Curricula for teenage pregnancy prevention shall emphasize that abstinence from sexual intercourse is the only protection that is 100 percent effective against unwanted teenage pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) when transmitted sexually, and that all other methods of contraception carry a risk of failure in preventing unwanted teenage pregnancy. The curricula shall:

(A) Include statistics based on the latest medical information citing the failure and success rates of condoms and other contraceptives in preventing pregnancy.

(B) Stress that sexually transmitted diseases are serious possible hazards of sexual intercourse, and shall include statistics based on the latest medical information citing the failure and success rates of condoms in preventing AIDS and other sexually transmitted diseases.

(C) Include a discussion of the possible emotional and psychological consequences of preadolescent and adolescent sexual intercourse outside of marriage and the consequences of unwanted adolescent pregnancy.

(3) Evaluate the current foster parent training funding formula and explore funding alternatives to ensure that a permanent and adequate funding source is available.

(4) Evaluate current recruitment strategies and facilitate the expansion of recruitment activities, especially targeting minority families for the promotion of the placement of minority youth with trained and culturally competent families of the same ethnicity and cultural background.

(5) In its foster parent recruitment and training effort, place special emphasis on the recruitment of prospective foster parents willing to accept sibling placements and the training of foster parents to ensure they are able and ready to care for a sibling group.

(c) It is not the intent of the Legislature and nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring foster parents to participate in this training program in whole or in part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

(a) The monthly or daily charge, not to exceed cost, for care, support, and maintenance of minor persons placed or detained in or committed to any institution by order of a juvenile court, the cost of supervision referred to by Section 903.2, and the cost of sealing records in county or local agency custody referred to by Section 903.3 shall be determined by the board of supervisors. The cost of dependency-related legal services referred to by Section 903.1 and the cost of sealing records in court custody referred to by Section 903.3 shall be determined by the court. Any determination made by a court under this section shall be valid only if either (1) made under procedures adopted by the Judicial Council
 or (2) approved by the Judicial Council.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 27.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

911.

No order for payment from the county treasury of the expense of support and maintenance of a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court shall be effective for more than 12 months, and no order for payment from the county treasury of the expense of support and maintenance of a minor person concerning whom a verified petition has been filed in accordance with the provision of this chapter, other than a ward or dependent child of the court, shall be effective for more than one month. Upon all hearings of the case of any ward or dependent child of the juvenile court, the case shall be continued on the calendar, but in no instance to exceed 12 months.

When any ward of the juvenile court is, with the consent of the juvenile court of the county committing him and the officer in charge of the state school to which he was committed or in which he is confined, placed in a boarding home, foster home, or work home, but continues to be under the supervision of such state school, the county may reimburse the boarding home, foster home, or work home in an amount adequate for the maintenance of the ward, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) per month.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

912.

(a) A county from which a person is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, shall pay to the state an annual rate of twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000) while the person remains in an institution under the direct supervision of the division, or in an institution, boarding home, foster home, or other private or public institution in which the person is placed by the division, and cared for and supported at the expense of the division, as provided in this subdivision. This subdivision applies to a person who is committed to the division by a juvenile court on or after July 1, 2012.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, shall present to the county, not more frequently than monthly, a claim
 for the amount due to the state under this subdivision, which the county shall process and pay pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(b) A county from which a person is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, on or after July 1, 2018, shall pay to the state an annual rate of twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000) for the time the person remains in an institution under the direct supervision of the division, or in an institution, boarding home, foster home, or other private or public institution in which the person is placed by the division, and cared for and supported at the expense of the division, as provided in this subdivision. A county shall not pay the annual rate of twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000) for a person who is 23 years of age or older. This subdivision applies to a person committed to the division by a
 juvenile court on or after July 1, 2018.

(c) A county from which a person is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, on or after July 1, 2021, shall pay to the state an annual rate of one-hundred and twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) for the time the person remains in an institution under the direct supervision of the division, or in an institution, boarding home, foster home, or other private or public institution in which the person is placed by the division, and cared for and supported at the expense of the division, as provided in this subdivision. A county shall not pay the annual rate of one-hundred and twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) for a person who is 23 years of age or older. This subdivision applies to a person committed to the division by a juvenile court on or after July 1, 2021.

(d) Consistent with
 Article 1 (commencing with Section 6024) of Chapter 5 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall collect and maintain available information and data about the movement of juvenile offenders committed by a juvenile court and placed in any institution, boarding home, foster home, or other private or public institution in which they are cared for, supervised, or both, by the division or the county while they are on parole, probation, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 31.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

913.

When any person has been adjudged to be a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court, and the court has made an order committing such person to the care of any association, society, or corporation, embracing within its objects the purpose of caring for or obtaining homes for such persons, the county in which such person has been committed may contract with such custodian, for the supervision, investigation, and rehabilitation of such person by such custodian, and may, pursuant to such contract, pay to it an amount determined by mutual agreement, not to exceed the cost to such custodian of such service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

914.

As used in this article, “expense for support and maintenance” includes the reasonable value of any medical services furnished to the ward or dependent child at the county hospital or at any other county institution, or at any private hospital or by any private physician with the approval of the juvenile court of the county concerned, and the reasonable value of the support of the ward or dependent child at any juvenile hall established pursuant to the provisions of Article 23 (commencing with Section 850) of this chapter or the reasonable value of the ward’s support at any forestry camp, juvenile home, ranch, or camp established within or without the county pursuant to the provisions of Article 24 (commencing with Section 880) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 26. Work Furloughs [925. - 930.]

925.

The provisions of this article shall be operative in any county in which the board of supervisors by ordinance finds, on the basis of employment conditions, the state of juvenile detention facilities, and other pertinent circumstances, that the operation of this article in that county is feasible. In such ordinance the board shall prescribe whether the probation officer or any official in charge of a county juvenile detention facility shall perform the functions of the juvenile work furlough administrator. The board of supervisors may also terminate the operativeness of this article in the county if it finds by ordinance that, because of changed circumstances, the operation of this article in that county is no longer feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

926.
